District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

50-2641

Citizens’ Advisory Task Force; established.

Expired.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-98, “Neighborhood Municipal Off-Street Parking Facilities Amendment Act of 1987.”, see Mayor’s Order 88-186, August 17, 1988.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-98, “Neighborhood Municipal Off-Street Parking Facilities Amendment Act of 1987”, see Mayor’s Order 88-186, August 17, 1988.

Editor's Notes

Expiration of Citizens’ Advisory Task Force: Pursuant to subsection (h) of former § 50-2641, the Citizens’ Advisory Task Force, which was established by D.C. Law 7-98, was to complete its work and submit a final report with recommendations to the Mayor and the Council 4 years from March 29, 1988, on which date all authority of the Task Force would expire. The Citizens’ Advisory Task Force is, therefore, deemed to have expired on March 29, 1992.